Arkansas, session 2025, HB1829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-15-103 is amended to read as follows:
9-15-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Commercial mobile radio service” means commercial mobile
service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 332, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(2) “County where the petitioner resides” means the county in
which the petitioner physically resides at the time the petition is filed and
may include a county where the petitioner is located for a short-term stay in
a domestic violence shelter;
*LJH199*
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
(3)(A) “Dating relationship” means a romantic or intimate social
relationship between two (2) individuals that shall be determined by
examining the following factors:
(i) The length of the relationship;
(ii) The type of the relationship; and
(iii) The frequency of interaction between the two
(2) individuals involved in the relationship.
(B) “Dating relationship” does not include a casual
relationship or ordinary fraternization between two (2) individuals in a
business or social context;
(4) “Domestic abuse” means:
(A) Physical harm, bodily injury, assault, or the
infliction of fear of imminent physical harm, bodily injury, or assault
between family or household members; or
(B) Any sexual conduct between family or household
members, whether minors or adults, that constitutes a crime under the laws of
this state;
(C)(i) A pattern of behavior that in purpose or effect
unreasonably interferes with the free will and personal liberty of a person,
also known as "course of control".
(ii) As used in subdivision (4)(C)(i) of this
section, "course of control" means a pattern of behavior that in purpose or
effect unreasonably interferes with the free will and personal liberty of a
person and includes without limitation the unreasonable:
(a) Isolation of a person from his or her
friends, relatives, or other sources of support;
(b) Deprivation of a person's basic
necessities;
(c) Control, regulation, or monitoring of a
person's movements, communications, daily behavior, finances, economic
resources, or access to resources; or
(d) Compelling of a person by intimidation,
force, threat of force, or threat based on actual or suspected immigration
status to engage in conduct from which the person has a right to abstain or
to abstain from conduct in which the person has a right to engage; or
(D)(i) A pattern of behavior that unreasonably destroys
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
the mental or emotional calm of a family or household member based on the
totality of the circumstances, also known as "disturbing the peace".
(ii) As used in subdivision (4)(D)(i) of this
section, "disturbing the peace" means a pattern of behavior that unreasonably
destroys the mental or emotional calm of a family or household member based
on the totality of the circumstances and includes without limitation:
(a) Molesting the other party;
(b) Attacking the other party;
(c) Striking the other party;
(d) Stalking the other party;
(e) Threatening the other party;
(f) Sexually assaulting the other party;
(g) Battering the other party;
(h) Credibly impersonating the other party;
(i) Falsely impersonating the other party;
(j) Harassing the other party;
(k) Telephoning the other party with the
intent to harass the other party;
(l) Destroying the personal property of the
other party;
(m) Directly or indirectly contacting the
other party with the intent to harass the other party;
(n) Coming within a specified distance of the
other party;
(o) Disturbing the peace of the other party;
(p) Disturbing the peace of a family member or
household member of the other party; or
(q) Any other act that the court determines
should be enjoined;
(5) “Family or household members” means spouses, former spouses,
parents and children, persons related by blood within the fourth degree of
consanguinity, in-laws, any children residing in the household, persons who
presently or in the past have resided or cohabited together, persons who have
or have had a child in common, and persons who are presently or in the past
have been in a dating relationship together;
(6) “In-laws” means persons related by marriage within the
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
second degree of consanguinity; and
(7) “Wireless telephone service provider” means a commercial
mobile radio service provider or reseller.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 9-15-201 is amended to read as follows:
9-15-201. Petition — Requirements generally.
(a) All petitions under this chapter shall be verified.
(b) The petition shall be filed with the circuit clerk in the county
where the petitioner resides, where the alleged incident of abuse occurred,
or where the respondent may be served.
(c)(1) A petition for relief under this chapter may be filed in the
circuit court.
(2) A petition for relief under this chapter may be filed in a
pilot district court if the jurisdiction is established by the Supreme Court
under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 80, § 7, and if the cases are assigned
to the pilot district court through the administrative plan under Supreme
Court Administrative Order No. 14.
(d) A petition may be filed by:
(1) Any adult family or household member on behalf of himself or
herself;
(2) Any adult family or household member on behalf of another
family or household member who is a minor, including a married minor;
(3) Any adult family or household member on behalf of another
family or household member who has been adjudicated an incompetent; or
(4) An employee or volunteer of a domestic-violence shelter or
program on behalf of a minor, including a married minor.
(e)(d)(1) A petition for relief shall:
(A) Allege the existence of domestic abuse;
(B) Disclose the existence of any pending litigation
between the parties; and
(C) Disclose any prior filings of a petition for an order
of protection under this chapter.
(2) The petition shall be accompanied by an affidavit made under
oath that states the specific facts and circumstances of the domestic abuse
and the specific relief sought.
(f)(e) The petition may be filed regardless of whether there is any
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
pending litigation between the parties.
(g)(f) A person's right to file a petition, or obtain relief hereunder
under this section shall not be affected by his or her leaving the residence
or household to avoid abuse.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 9-15-203 is amended to read as follows:
9-15-203. Petition — Form.
(a) The circuit clerk shall provide simplified forms and clerical
assistance to help petitioners with the writing and filing of a petition
under this chapter if the petitioner is not represented by counsel.
(b)(1) The Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission
shall develop an informational pamphlet that provides information on domestic
violence resources in consultation with experts on domestic abuse prevention
and intervention.
(2) The circuit clerk shall provide the informational pamphlet
developed under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(b)(c) The petition form shall not require or suggest that a
petitioner include his or her Social Security number or the Social Security
number of the respondent in the petition.
(c)(d)(1)(A) A petitioner may omit his or her home address or business
address from all documents filed with the court.
(B) If a petitioner omits his or her home address, the
petitioner shall provide the court with a mailing address.
(2) If disclosure of a petitioner's home address is necessary to
determine jurisdiction or consider venue, the court may order the disclosure
of the petitioner's home address:
(A) After receiving the petitioner's consent;
(B) Orally and in chambers, out of the presence of the
respondent, and a sealed record to be made; or
(C) After a hearing, if the court takes into consideration
the safety of the petitioner and finds the disclosure in the interest of
justice.
(d)(e) The petition may be in substantially the following form:
“Petition for Order of Protection

Case No. _____________
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829

_____________ Petitioner's home address:
Petitioner _____________________________
_____________________________
_____________ Petitioner's work address:
Date of Birth _____________________________

vs.

_____________ Respondent's home address:
Respondent _____________________________
_____________________________
_____________ Respondent's work address:
Date of Birth, _____________________________
if known _____________________________

______ I am the petitioner and ______ at least 18 years of age ______ under
18 but emancipated.
______ I am filing on behalf of myself.
______ I am filing on behalf of a family or household member who is:
______ a minor(s): (list) ___________________________________________________
______ an adjudicated incompetent person: (list) ____________________________
______ The respondent is ______ at least 18 years of age ______ under 18 but
emancipated.
______ I am an employee or volunteer of a domestic violence shelter or
program, and I am filing on behalf of a minor.
The respondent and petitioner (or victim if filing on behalf of a minor or
incompetent person): (check all that apply)
______ Are spouses; ______ Are related by blood;
______ Are parent and child; ______ Currently reside together
or cohabit;
______ Are former spouses; ______ Formerly resided together or
cohabitated;
______ Have or have had a child in common;
or ______ Are presently or in the past
have been in a dating relationship.
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
If order of protection of children is requested:
Children Date of Birth Address Relationship to Parties
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
The respondent has committed domestic abuse to the petitioner or victim by
the following acts: (describe)
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
I am afraid of the respondent and: (describe)
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________ (1) There is an immediate and present danger of domestic abuse
to me; or
_____________ (2) The respondent is scheduled to be released from
incarceration within thirty (30) days and upon the respondent's release there
will be an immediate and present danger of domestic abuse to me.
The reasons are as follows: (describe)
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
______ Petitioner requests that the court issue an ex parte order of
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
protection with the following provisions: (check all that apply)
______ Excluding the respondent from a shared residence or from the residence
of the petitioner or victim. Address of residence:
_____________________________________________________________________________
______ Excluding the respondent from the place of business, employment,
school, or other location of the petitioner or victim. Address of residence:
_____________________________________________________________________________
______ Excluding the respondent from the place of business, employment,
school, or other location of the petitioner or victim. Address of:
Place of business: __________________________________________________________
Employment: _________________________________________________________________
School: _____________________________________________________________________
Other (identify): ___________________________________________________________
Prohibiting the respondent, directly or through an agent, from contacting the
petitioner or victim, except under the following conditions:
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
______ Awarding temporary custody of minor children as follows:
Child's Name and Name of Person to Receive Custody
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
______ Requiring the respondent to pay child support in the amount of
$_____________ per child per month
______ Requiring the respondent to pay spousal support in the amount of
$_____________ per month
______ Excluding the petitioner's address from notice to the respondent
______ It is further requested that upon hearing, the court issue a full
order of protection with the following provisions: (check all that apply)
_____________ Excluding the respondent from the shared residence or from the
residence of the petitioner or victim. Address of the
residence:___________________________________________________________________
______ Excluding the respondent from the place of business, employment,
school, or other location of the petitioner or victim. Address of:
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
Place of business: __________________________________________________________
Employment: _________________________________________________________________
School: _____________________________________________________________________
Other (identify): ___________________________________________________________
______ Awarding temporary custody of minor children as follows:
Child's Name and Name of Person to Receive Custody
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
_____________________________________________________________________________
______ Requiring the respondent to pay child support in the amount of
$_____________ per child per month
______ Requiring the respondent to pay spousal support in the amount of
$_____________ per month
______ Requiring the respondent to pay filing fees, service fees, court costs
and petitioner's attorney fees.
______ I am involved in pending litigation with the respondent in the case
of:
Case No.: ___________________________________________________________________
Circuit or District Judge: __________________________________________________
County or City: _____________________________________________________________
______ I have previously filed a petition for an order of protection against
the respondent in the following case or cases:
Case No.: ___________________________________________________________________
Circuit Judge: ______________________________________________________________
County: _____________________________________________________________________
The petitioner under oath states that the facts stated in the above petition
are true according to the petitioner's best knowledge and belief.
________________________
Date

________________________
Petitioner's signature

STATE OF ARKANSAS
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
COUNTY OF _____________________
Subscribed and sworn to before me this _____________ day of
_____________, 20______.

________________________
Notary Public
My Commission Expires:
________________________".

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 9-15-205(a), concerning the relief that a
court may order upon a hearing for a petition for an order of protection
under the Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, is amended to read as follows:
(a) At the hearing on the petition filed under this chapter, upon a
finding of domestic abuse as defined in § 9-15-103, the court may provide the
following relief:
(1) Exclude the abusing party from the dwelling that the parties
share or from the residence of the petitioner or victim;
(2) Exclude the abusing party from the place of business or
employment, school, or other location of the petitioner or victim;
(3)(A) Award temporary custody or establish temporary visitation
rights with regard to minor children of the parties.
(B)(i) If a previous child custody or visitation
determination has been made by another court with continuing jurisdiction
with regard to the minor children of the parties, a temporary child custody
or visitation determination may be made under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this
section.
(ii) The order shall remain in effect until the court
with original jurisdiction enters a subsequent order regarding the children;
(4) Order temporary support for minor children or a spouse, with
such support to be enforced in the manner prescribed by law for other child
support and alimony awards;
(5) Allow the prevailing party a reasonable attorney's fee as
part of the costs;
(6) Prohibit the abusing party directly or through an agent from
contacting the petitioner or victim except under specific conditions named in
the order;
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
(7) Direct the exclusive care, possession, custody, or control
of any pet animal owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by: either party
residing in the household; and
(A) The petitioner;
(B) The respondent; or
(C) A minor residing in the residence or household of
either the petitioner or the respondent;
(8)(A) The court may order the respondent to refrain from:
(i) Coming into contact with the animal; or
(ii) Taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing,
molesting, attacking, striking, threatening, harming, or disposing of the
animal;
(B) Subdivision (8)(A) of this section does not limit any
other remedy available to a petitioner by another provision of law;
(9) Prohibit the respondent from taking any action that could
result in the termination of any necessary utility service or another
necessary service related to the family dwelling or the dwelling of the
petitioner;
(10) Prohibit the respondent from taking any action that could
result in the cancellation or change of coverage or change of beneficiary of
any health, automobile, or homeowner's insurance policy to the detriment of
the petitioner or a dependent child in common of the petitioner and
respondent;
(11) Prohibit the respondent from transferring, encumbering,
concealing, or disposing of specified property owned or leased by the
petitioner;
(12) Provide the petitioner with temporary possession of an
automobile, debit card, credit card, checkbook, documentation related to
financial accounts, documentation related to the petitioner's health,
documentation related to automobile or homeowner's insurance, documentation
related to proving identity, a key, or other necessary specified personal
effects;
(13) Order the respondent to complete a domestic violence
intervention program;
(14) Order the appointment of an attorney ad litem under Admin.
Order No. 15.1 to represent any minor child or children; or
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
(8)(15)(A) Order other relief as the court deems necessary or
appropriate for the protection of a family or household member.
(B) The relief may include, but not be limited to, without
limitation enjoining and restraining the abusing party from doing, attempting
to do, or threatening to do any act injuring, mistreating, molesting, or
harassing the petitioner.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 9-15-219 is repealed.
9-15-219. Order of protection — Course of control — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Course of control” means a pattern of behavior that in
purpose or effect unreasonably interferes with the free will and personal
liberty of a person.
(B) “Course of control” includes without limitation the
following:
(i) Unreasonably isolating a person from his or her
friends, relatives, or other sources of support;
(ii) Unreasonably depriving a person of basic
necessities;
(iii) Unreasonably controlling, regulating, or
monitoring a person's movements, communications, daily behavior, finances,
economic resources, or access to resources; and
(iv) Unreasonably compelling a person by
intimidation, force, threat of force, or threat based on actual or suspected
immigration status to engage in conduct from which the person has a right to
abstain or to abstain from conduct in which the person has a right to engage;
and
(2)(A) “Disturbing the peace” means a pattern of behavior that
unreasonably destroys the mental or emotional calm of a family or household
member based on the totality of the circumstances.
(B) “Disturbing the peace” includes without limitation
course of control.
(b) A court may enter an ex parte order enjoining a party from
engaging in course of control or disturbing the peace, including without
limitation through one (1) or more of the following acts:
(1) Molesting the other party;
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
(2) Attacking the other party;
(3) Striking the other party;
(4) Stalking the other party;
(5) Threatening the other party;
(6) Sexually assaulting the other party;
(7) Battering the other party;
(8) Credibly impersonating the other party;
(9) Falsely impersonating the other party;
(10) Harassing the other party;
(11) Telephoning the other party with the intent to harass the
other party;
(12) Destroying the personal property of the other party;
(13) Directly or indirectly contacting the other party with the
intent to harass the other party;
(14) Coming within a specified distance of the other party;
(15) Disturbing the peace of the other party;
(16) Disturbing the peace of a family member or household member
of the other party; or
(17) Any other act that the court determines should be enjoined.
(c)(1) Upon a showing of good cause, an order of protection may
include an order granting the petitioner the exclusive care, possession, or
control of an animal owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by:
(A) The petitioner;
(B) The respondent; or
(C) A minor residing in the residence or household of
either the petitioner or respondent.
(2) The court may order the respondent to refrain from:
(A) Coming into contact with the animal; or
(B) Taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing,
molesting, attacking, striking, threatening, harming, or otherwise disposing
of the animal.
(d) This section does not limit any other remedy available to a
petitioner by another provision of law.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code Title 9, Chapter 15, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add additional sections to read as follows:
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
9-15-220. Hearing — Ability of party or child to appear outside the
physical presence of the other party.
(a) The court may allow the testimony of a party or a child who is the
subject of a proceeding under this chapter to be taken outside the physical
presence of any other party.
(b) This section does not limit any party's right to cross-examine a
witness whose testimony is taken in a room other than the courtroom in
accordance with an order made under this section.

9-15-221. Sheriff's office — Duties.
(a) The sheriff’s office in every county in the state shall designate
at least one (1) officer to serve petitions, notices of hearing, ex parte
orders of protection, and final orders of protection on a respondent under
this subchapter.
(b)(1) The designated officer shall:
(A) Attempt to serve the respondent within two (2) hours
of receiving the document;
(B) Keep a record of every attempt made to serve the
respondent;
(C) Maintain a log detailing each attempt to serve the
respondent, including without limitation the date, time, and address related
to each attempt made.
(2) If the respondent is in a county other than the county where
the petition was filed, the designated officer in the county where the
respondent is located shall perform the duties included listed in subdivision
(b)(1) of this section.
(c) The circuit clerk shall immediately provide the petition, ex parte
temporary order, if granted, and notice of hearing to the designated officer.
(d)(1) The county sheriff shall immediately enter or cause to be
entered any orders and subsequent modifications or cancellations made under
this subchapter into the registry of orders of protection and temporary
orders of protection order under § 12-12-215.
(2) If the county sheriff does not have a center terminal and
entries are made by another agency that does have a center terminal, the
agency with the center terminal shall make such entries immediately upon
receipt of information from the county sheriff.
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829

9-15-222. Violation of order of protection — Expedited hearing.
(a) An expedited hearing shall be scheduled when a motion for contempt
is filed that alleges a violation of an order of protection.
(b) A request for relief under this section shall not preclude a party
from seeking any other civil or criminal relief.

9-15-223. Domestic violence intervention programs — Definition —
Purpose.
(a) As used in this section, "batterer intervention program or a
domestic violence intervention program” means a certified intervention
program that:
(1) Provides classes to individuals who commit acts of domestic
violence or abuse; and
(2) Offers nonviolent strategies and values that promote respect
and equality in a dating relationship.
(b) The purpose of a batterer intervention program or a domestic
violence intervention program is to:
(1) Hold batterers accountable;
(2) Promote safety for victims;
(3) Interrupt, avoid, and end domestic violence and abuse; and
(4) Recognize that a participant in a batterer intervention
program or a domestic violence intervention program may need additional
services for mental health treatment, drug and alcohol treatment, parenting
education, or other issues, and aid that participant in the connection to
those services.
(c) The Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission shall
be responsible for certification of a batterer intervention program or a
domestic violence intervention program.
(d) A batterer intervention program or a domestic violence
intervention program shall operate within a framework of the following
fundamental tenets:
(1) Battery or domestic abuse is a pattern of behavior and not a
singular event;
(2) While battery or domestic abuse is not an addiction or
disease and not caused by alcohol or substance abuse, alcohol or substance
03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1829
abuse can be an aggravating factor and should be addressed;
(3) A batterer or a domestic abuser is solely responsible for
his or her actions and must be held accountable for his or her violence and
abuse;
(4) A batterer intervention program or a domestic violence
intervention program service provider may provide factual information, but he
or she shall not participate as an advocate for a batterer or a domestic
abuser in a court setting; and
(5) Family reunification services to address behavior that
constitutes battery or domestic abuse are:
(A) Inappropriate as the primary intervention; and
(B) Should not be used in the beginning stages of the
batterer intervention program or a domestic violence intervention program or
while violence is still occurring.

/s/Dalby




















03-19-2025 15:37:57 LJH199